pt-BR: Roda de fiar ajuste de tensão tipo: Tensão magnética; Ajuste da base principal (MOA); Nenhum; Tensor de parafuso/botão; Bobina deslizante; Tensor de mola; Outros
cs: Typ nastavení napnutí kolovratu: Magnetické napínání; Základna křídla (MOA); Žádné; Šroubový/otočný napínač; Posuvná cívka; Pružinový napínač; Jiné
es: Tipo de ajuste de tensión de la rueca: Tensión magnética; Ajuste de base (MOA); Ninguno; Tensor de tornillo/perilla; Bobina deslizante; Tensor de resorte; Otro
ja: 紡ぎ車張力調整タイプ: マグネットテンション; マザーオブオール (MOA) 調整; なし; ネジ/ノブテンショナー; スライディングボビン; スプリングテンショナー; その他
hu: Rokkafeszesség-beállítás típusa: Mágneses feszítés; Mother-of-all (MOA) beállítás; Nincs; Csavaros/gombos feszítő; Csúszó orsó; Rugós feszítő; Egyéb
fr: Type de réglage de la tension du rouet: Tension magnétique; Ajustement du support d’épinglier (MOA); Aucun; Tendeur à vis/bouton; Bobine coulissante; Tendeur à ressort; Autre
nb: Justeringstype for spinnhjulspenning: Magnetisk stramming; Justering av Mother-of-all (MOA); Ingen; Skrue-/knappstrammer; Glidende spole; Fjærstrammer; Annet
it: Tipo di regolazione della tensione della ruota di filatura: Tensione magnetica; Regolazione mother-of-all (MOA); Nessuna; Tenditore a vite/manopola; Bobina scorrevole; Tenditore a molla; Altro
ru: Тип регулировки натяжения прялки: Магнитное натяжение; Регулировка основания рогульки (MOA); Нет; Винтовое натяжение; Скользящая катушка; Пружинное натяжение; Другое
fi: Rukin kireyden säätötyyppi: Magneettinen kiristys; MOA (Mother-of-all) -säätö; Ei mitään; Ruuvi-/nuppikiristin; Liukuva puola; Jousikiristin; Muu
tr: Eğirme çarkı gerilim ayar tipi: Manyetik gerginlik; Mother-of-all (MOA) ayarı; Yok; Vida/düğme gerdirici; Kayar masura; Yaylı gerdirici; Diğer
sk-SK: Typ nastavenia napnutia kolovrátku: Magnetické napínanie; Nastavenie MOA (Mother-of-all); Žiadne; Napínač so skrutkou/gombíkom; Posuvná cievka; Pružinový napínač; Iné
pt-PT: Tipo de ajuste da tensão da roda giratória: Tensão magnética; Ajuste de Mother-of-all (MOA); Nenhum; Tensor de parafuso/botão; Bobina deslizante; Tensor de mola; Outro
sv: Justeringstyp för spinnrocksspänning: Magnetisk spänning; Justering av moderstock (MOA); Ingen; Skruv-/rattspänning; Glidande spole; Fjäderspännare; Annat
lt-LT: Verpimo ratelio įtempimo reguliavimo tipas: Magnetinis įtempimas; Pagrindo (MOA) reguliavimas; Nėra; Sraigtinis / rankenėlės įtempiklis; Slankiojanti ritė; Spyruoklinis įtempiklis; Kita
da: Type af spændingsjustering på spinderok: Magnetisk spænding; Mother-of-all-justering (MOA); Ingen; Skrue-/knapstrammer; Glidende spole; Fjederstrammer; Andet
ro-RO: Tip de reglare a tensiunii roții de tors: Tensiune magnetică; Ajustare suport ansamblu de tors (MOA); Niciuna; Întinzător cu șurub/buton; Bobină glisantă; Întinzător cu arc; Altele
ko: 스피닝 휠 장력 조절 유형: 마그네틱 텐션; 마더 오브 올(MOA) 조절; 없음; 나사/노브 텐셔너; 슬라이딩 보빈; 스프링 텐셔너; 기타
pl: Rodzaj regulacji naciągu kołowrotka: Naciąg magnetyczny; Regulacja bazy (Mother-of-all); Brak; Naciąg śrubowy / na pokrętło; Przesuwana szpula; Naciąg sprężynowy; Inne
th: ประเภทการปรับความตึงของล้อหมุน: ความตึงแม่เหล็ก; การปรับฐานฟลายเออร์ (MOA); ไม่มี; ตัวปรับความตึงแบบสกรู/ลูกบิด; กระสวยเลื่อน; ตัวปรับความตึงแบบสปริง; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Vrsta podešavanja napetosti kolovrata: Magnetska napetost; Podešavanje osnove (MOA); Bez; Zatezač s vijkom/ručicom; Klizna špula; Opružni zatezač; Ostalo
vi: Loại điều chỉnh độ căng của bánh xe quay: Độ căng từ tính; Điều chỉnh thanh đỡ ngang (MOA); Không có; Bộ căng vít/núm vặn; Ống chỉ trượt; Bộ căng lò xo; Khác
nl: Spinnewiel spanningsverstelling type: Magnetische spanning; Mother-of-all (MOA)-aanpassing; Geen; Schroef-/knopspanner; Schuivende spoel; Veerspanner; Overige
sl-SI: Vrsta nastavljanja napetosti kolovrata: Magnetna napetost; Prilagoditev podnožja »Mother-of-all«; Brez; Vijačni napenjalnik z gumbom; Drsno vreteno; Vzmetni napenjalnik; Drugo
zh-TW: 紡車張力調整類型: 磁力張力; 紡翼基座 (MOA) 調整; 無; 螺絲/旋鈕張力器; 滑動式線軸; 彈簧張力器; 其他
en: Spinning wheel tension adjustment type: Magnetic tension; Mother-of-all (MOA) adjustment; None; Screw/knob tensioner; Sliding bobbin; Spring tensioner; Other
zh-CN: 纺车张力调节型: 磁性张力; 主支架 (MOA) 调节; 无; 螺钉/旋钮张紧器; 滑动筒管; 弹簧张紧器; 其他
bg-BG: Тип на регулиране на напрежението при въртящото се колело: Магнитно обтягане; Регулиране на основата (Mother-of-all); Няма; Обтегач с винт/врътка; Плъзгащо се калерче; Пружинен обтегач; Друго
el: Τύπος ρύθμισης τάσης τροχού γνεσίματος: Μαγνητική τάση; Ρύθμιση Mother-of-all (MOA); Καμία; Εντατήρας με βίδα/λαβή; Συρόμενο μασούρι; Εντατήρας με ελατήριο; Άλλο
de: Art der Spannungseinstellung des Spinnrads: Magnetische Spannung; Mother-of-All-Anpassung (MOA); Keine; Schrauben-/Drehknopfspanner; Verschiebbare Spule; Federspanner; Sonstige